Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.581

End of participation in judicial retirement account plan—Newly elected or appointed judges.

Beginning January 1, 2007, any newly elected or appointed supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge, who is a member of plan 1, shall not participate in the judicial retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW in lieu of prospective contribution and benefit provisions under chapter 189, Laws of 2006.

[ 2006 c 189 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 189: See note following RCW 2.14.115.